California statutes. Education Code
(b) The board of supervisors, in lieu of proceeding under subdivision (a), shall agree with the governing board of the school district providing classes or schools for prisoners, to transfer from the general fund of the county to the general fund of the district such sums, in excess of the amount of money received on the basis of average daily attendance in such programs, as is necessary to maintain its school programs in the county jail, county honor farm, county industrial farm or county or joint county road camps as described in Section 1907.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1267.)
-------------------------------------------

1909.

(a) From funds appropriated for allocation pursuant to Sections 2558 and 41841.5, for each county superintendent of schools who maintained schools or classes for adults in correctional facilities in the 1981–82 fiscal year pursuant to Section 1906, and who continues to maintain those schools or classes in each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall allow in the 1982–83 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount equal to the actual current expenses of the program, but not to exceed an amount determined as follows:

(1) Compute the prior year statewide average local control funding formula per unit of average daily attendance for adults, increased by a relevant cost-of-living allowance prescribed in the
 annual Budget Act.

(2) Multiply the amount computed in paragraph (1) by the average daily attendance of the schools or classes in the current fiscal year.

(3) Multiply the product determined in paragraph (2) for each fiscal year by 0.8.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for the 1993–94 and 1994–95 fiscal years, in no event shall the amount allowed to a county superintendent of schools for each unit of average daily attendance pursuant to that subdivision exceed the statewide average revenue limit at which adults in correctional facilities were funded in the 1992–93 fiscal year, as adjusted by any cost-of-living adjustment pursuant to Section 42238.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 2.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1909.5.

The calculation made pursuant to Section 1909 is subject to Article 9 (commencing with Section 41840) of Chapter 5 of Part 24.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.7. Youth and Adult Offender Education [1915. - 1915.]

1915.

In addition to any educational opportunity available under Article 14.5 (commencing with Section 1900), any youth or adult offender in custody in Sacramento County shall be permitted, notwithstanding any other provision of law, to enroll in any appropriate educational program operated by a school district, community college district, or private school in that county, subject to the objectives, standards, and conditions set forth in Section 1203m of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1358, Sec. 3.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Emergency Schools [1920. - 1924.]

1920.

In order to provide elementary education for children residing in the county, or in order to provide elementary education for children of migratory laborers engaged in seasonal industries within the county, the county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, when funds are not available from other sources and in his judgment it is necessary, do any one or more of the following acts:

(a) Establish and maintain one or more emergency elementary schools for children.

(b) Provide one or more emergency teachers for the regular elementary schools of the districts in the county for the pupils.

(c) Provide transportation for the children to an elementary school.

In lieu of providing transportation of any pupil, the county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, pay to the parents or guardian of the pupil the cost of food and lodging for the pupil at a place convenient to an elementary school. The amount so paid shall not exceed the cost of providing for the transportation of the pupil to and from his home and the school.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, pay the expenses incurred in providing all the facilities and services authorized in this section, including necessary capital outlays, from the county school service fund.

All emergency schools shall be maintained in accordance with standards prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1921.

The county superintendent of schools shall draw requisitions upon the unobligated funds of any suspended school district under his jurisdiction to pay in whole or in part the expenses incurred for the maintenance of emergency schools in the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1922.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, insure all real and personal property constructed, purchased, or otherwise provided by him for emergency schools established by him.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1923.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, transfer or sell the real and personal property of any emergency school maintained by him to any elementary school district under his jurisdiction, or to any other political subdivision of the state within which the school is located, upon such terms and conditions as are agreed upon by the county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the county board of education, and the governing board or authority of the district or other political subdivision. Districts and other political subdivisions may enter into such agreements and acquire such property. Any funds received by the county superintendent of schools under this section shall be paid by him into the county school service fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1924.

The units of average daily attendance for a fiscal year in an emergency school maintained by the county superintendent of schools shall be computed by dividing the total number of days of pupils’ attendance in the emergency school during the fiscal year by 175.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Miscellaneous [1940. - 1946.]

1940.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, expend county school service funds for the purpose of administering and accounting for the county school service fund, or he may, with the approval of the county board of education, contract with and pay the board of supervisors for services rendered in administering and accounting for the county school service fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1941.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, provide services to school districts or community college districts in screening and directing teachers to the schools under his jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, pay actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in connection with curricular and special services by the county superintendent of schools or by his designated staff members in accordance with regulations established by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1943.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, employ personnel to conduct research in connection with the activities of the county superintendent of schools, and to develop systems, procedures and methods for applying such research findings to improve the effectiveness of those activities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1944.

The county superintendent of schools may with the approval of the county board of education provide for the publication of materials that are necessary in connection with the curricular and special services that the superintendent of schools is authorized to perform in the county. The county superintendent of schools may, in accordance with regulations adopted by the county board of education and for educational use, sell or give away the published materials or may exchange them for similar published materials. Unless restricted by the regulations of the county board of education, the sale or gift may be made to, and the exchange may be made with, any person, political subdivision, public officer or agency, or educational institution. The distribution of the published materials in accordance with this section is declared to be a public purpose and in furtherance of Article IX, Section 1, of the California Constitution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1945.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, provide advisory services in school business administration activities, in maintenance of school building and grounds, and in the processing of special problems concerning credentials as designated by the State Department of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1946.

The county board of education may enter into agreements with the governing boards of any of the school districts or community college districts in the territory under the jurisdiction of the office of the county superintendent of schools for the conduct, under the direction of that office, of centralized in-service training programs for both certificated and classified employees of the school districts and community college districts and of that office.

Centralized in-service training program operations of the office of the county superintendent of schools shall be financed through the county school service fund, and shall be included in the budget prepared pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 14050) of Chapter 1 of Part 9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. County Community Schools [1980. - 1986.]

1980.

A county board of education may establish and maintain one or more community schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

1981.

The county board of education may enroll pupils in a county community school who are any of the following:

(a) Expelled from a school district for any reason other than those specified in subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 48915.

(b) (1) Referred to a county community school by a school district as a result of the recommendation by a school attendance review board. A pupil shall not be referred to a county community school by a school district pursuant to this subdivision unless the school district and the county office of education determine all of the
 following:

(A) The county community school has space available to enroll the pupil.

(B) The county community school meets the educational needs of the pupil.

(C) (i) The parent, guardian, or responsible adult of the pupil has not expressly objected to the referral based on one or more of the following reasons:

(I) Reasonable concerns related to the pupil’s safety.

(II) Geographic accessibility.

(III) Inability to transport.

(IV) The school does not meet the
 pupil’s educational needs.

(ii) The school district may require the objection to be in writing if it has advised the parent, guardian, or responsible adult that they may object, in writing, for one of these reasons.

(2) If the county community
 school recommended pursuant to paragraph (1) is not geographically accessible to the pupil, the school attendance review board shall also include in its recommendation a school option for the pupil that is geographically accessible to the pupil and
 meets the criteria specified in paragraph (1).

(3) If the parent, guardian, or responsible adult of the pupil objects for any of the reasons described in subclauses (I) to (IV), inclusive, of clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), the school district may either address the express objection or find an alternative placement in another comprehensive or continuation school within the school district. If the school district has offered the pupil all other options, the school district may refer the pupil to the county community school.

(4) The pupil has the right to return to his
 or her prior school or another appropriate school within his or her school district at the end of the semester following the semester when the acts leading to referral occurred. The right to return shall continue until the end of the pupil’s 18th year of age, except that a pupil with exceptional needs, consistent with Section 56041 of this code and Section 1412(a)(1)(A) of Title 20 of the United States Code, shall have the right to return until he or she turns 22 years of age.

(c) (1) (A) On probation, with or without the supervision of a probation officer and consistent with an order of a juvenile court, who
 are considered to be wards of the court under Sections 601 and 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and ordered placed pursuant to Sections 725, 729.2, and 791 of, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 727 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) Under the supervision of a probation officer, with the consent of the minor and the minor’s parent or guardian, pursuant to Section 654 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) Under the supervision of a probation officer pursuant to Section 726 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 727 of the Welfare and Institutions Code with the consent of the pupil’s parent, guardian, or responsible adult appointed by the juvenile court to make educational decisions for the pupil. The enrollment of a minor covered by this
 paragraph in a county community school shall be consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 726 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, which provides that all educational and school placement decisions shall seek to ensure that the youth is in the least restrictive educational program, has
 access to the academic resources, services, and extracurricular and enrichment activities that are available to all pupils, and are based on the best interests of the child.

(D) Unless specifically ordered by a juvenile court, nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to conflict with the existing rights of a parent, guardian, or responsible adult appointed by the juvenile court pursuant to Section 726 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to make educational placement decisions for the minor.

(E) With respect to a pupil’s enrollment in a county community school pursuant to subparagraph (B) or (C), and consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 726 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and California Rule of Court 5.651, all of the following
 shall apply:

(i) The attorney for, or the person holding the educational rights of, a pupil who is under the jurisdiction of the delinquency court may use the procedures set forth in California Rule of Court 5.651 to address any change of placement that results in the enrollment of the pupil in a county community school that is not his or her school of origin.

(ii) The attorney or the person holding the educational rights appointed by the court for a pupil who is under the jurisdiction of the delinquency court may, during a regularly scheduled hearing, raise any concerns with respect to whether the enrollment of the pupil in a county community school is meeting the educational needs of the pupil.

(iii) Nothing in this
 subparagraph is intended to limit in any way the rights or responsibilities of any person as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 726 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and California Rule of Court 5.651.

(2) On probation or parole and not in attendance at any school, where enrollment is with the consent of the parent, guardian, or responsible adult, or the pupil, if he or she is 18 years of age or older. Nothing in this subdivision shall impact the provision of services or funding for youth up to 25 years of age pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1982, as that section read on September 25, 2013.

(3) Expelled for any of the reasons specified in subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 48915.

(4) Enrollment in a county community school pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 48645.5.

(d) Pupils whose school districts of attendance, or, for pupils who do not have school districts of attendance, school districts of residence, have, at the request of the pupil’s parent, guardian, or responsible adult, approved the pupil’s enrollment in a county community school, subject to the following:

(1) A pupil shall not be enrolled in a county community school pursuant to this subdivision unless the school district determines that the placement will promote the educational interests of the pupil and the county community school has space available to enroll the pupil.

(2) A parent, guardian, or responsible adult of a pupil enrolled in a county community school pursuant to this subdivision may rescind the request for the placement, and the pupil shall be immediately reenrolled in the school that the pupil attended at the time of the referral, or, with the consent of the parent, guardian, or responsible adult, another appropriate school.

(e) The procedures outlined in subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, of Section 51225.2 govern the transfer of credits, records, including special education records, and grades required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 48645.5 and Section 49068 when the pupil transfers to and from the county community school.

(f) For purposes of this section, “geographically accessible” means that the pupil can reasonably
 travel to and from the school and is able to pay for any transportation costs that are above and beyond the costs to attend his or her school of residence or prior school, whichever is farther away.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 837, Sec. 1.   (SB 1111)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1981.5.

(a) A pupil who is involuntarily enrolled in a county community school pursuant to subdivision (a) of, or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) or paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of, Section 1981 shall have the right to reenroll in his or her former school or another comprehensive school immediately after being readmitted from the expulsion order pursuant to Section 48916 or court-ordered placement. Nothing in this section is intended to limit the school placement options that a school district may recommend for a pupil being readmitted.

(b) Consistent with the process and procedures set forth in Section 48916, only the governing
 board of the school district that issued the initial order or subsequent order to expel may extend the duration of an expelled pupil’s placement in a county community school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 837, Sec. 3.   (SB 1111)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1983.

(a) Pupils enrolled in county community schools shall be assigned to classes or programs deemed most appropriate for reinforcing or reestablishing educational development.

(b) These classes or programs may include, but need not be limited to, basic educational skill development, on-the-job training, school credit recovery assistance, tutorial assistance, and individual guidance activities.

(c) To the extent that independent study is determined to satisfy the individually planned educational program described in subdivision (d) for a pupil attending a county community school, it shall meet all the requirements of Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51745) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 of Division 4 of
 Title 2, including the requirement that entry into that program is voluntary.

(d) An individually planned educational program based upon an educational assessment shall be prescribed for each pupil.

(e) The course of study of a county community school shall be adopted by the county board of education and shall enable each pupil to continue academic work leading to the completion of a regular high school program.

(f) Pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000) of Division 4 of Title 2, Chapter 33 (commencing with Section 1400) of Title 20 of the United States Code, and accompanying state and federal
 regulatory provisions, county boards of education operating county community schools shall ensure that assessments are administered in all areas of suspected disability and appropriate services and programs, as specified in a pupil’s individualized education program, are provided.

(g) County boards of education operating county community schools shall ensure that appropriate services and programs designed to address the language needs of pupils identified as English learners are provided in compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulatory provisions.

(h) For purposes of this section, “school credit recovery assistance” refers to a pupil passing, and receiving credit for, a course that the pupil previously attempted, but for which the pupil was unsuccessful in earning academic
 credit towards graduation. The pupil can recover the credit by satisfying requirements for the course in which they were unsuccessful and can focus on earning credit based on competency in the content standards for that particular course. Credit recovery programs aim to help schools graduate more pupils by giving pupils who have fallen behind the chance to recover credits through a multitude of different strategies. Different programs allow pupils to work on their credit recovery classes over the summer, on school breaks, after school, on weekends, at home on their own, at night in school computer labs, online, or even during the schoolday.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 451, Sec. 1.   (AB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1984.

For the purposes of establishing and maintaining a county community school, a county board of education shall be deemed to be a school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

1986.

(a) The Legislature hereby recognizes that community schools are a permissive educational program.

(b) If a county superintendent of schools elects to operate a community school pursuant to this chapter, he or she shall do one or more of the following:

(1) Utilize available school facilities that conform to the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2-101), Part 3 (commencing with Section 3-089-1), Part 4 (commencing with Section 4-403), and Part 5 (commencing with Section 5-102), of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) Apply for
 emergency portable classrooms pursuant to Section 17717.2 or Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 17785) of Part 10.

(3) Enter into lease agreements provided that the facilities are limited to one of the following:

(A) Single story, wood-framed structure.

(B) Single story, light steel frame structure.

(C) A structure where a structural engineer has submitted a report that determines substantial structural hazards do not exist. The county board of education shall review the report prior to approval of the lease and may reject the report if there is any evidence of fraud regarding the facts in the report.

(c) Before entering into any lease pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the
 county superintendent of schools shall certify that all reasonable efforts have been made to locate community schools in facilities that conform to the structural safety standards listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 21.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Attendance in Adjoining States [2000. - 2011.]

2000.

The county superintendent of schools of any county contiguous to an adjoining state may grant permission to pupils residing in the county to attend elementary school or high school in a school district of the adjoining state and may provide for the transportation of the pupils to the school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

2005.

The superintendent of schools of a school district, or the principal of a school, in an adjoining state attended by pupils residing in an adjoining county in this state shall certify to the county superintendent of schools of the county not later than July 2nd of each year the average daily attendance of pupils from the county attending the school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 33, Sec. 6.   (SB 859)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2010.

All requisitions drawn by the county superintendent of schools under this article shall be approved by the county auditor and paid by the county treasurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

2011.

The county superintendent of schools may with the approval of the county auditor transfer any unnecessary surplus in the county school tuition fund to the county school service fund whenever in his judgment the surplus will not be needed for the payment of tuition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Apportionment of County Forest Reserve School Money [2300. - 2300.]

2300.

The county auditor of any county, receiving money from the government of the United States pursuant to any act of Congress providing for the distribution and payment to states and territories of a fixed and definite percentage of the money received by the government of the United States from the forest reserves established therein, shall apportion the money pursuant to Section 29484 of the Government Code. The county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the county board of education, may allocate 15 percent of the funds from such money for use for the improvement of educational programs for students in the county. The balance of the money credited to the forest reserve account in the county school service fund from the United States Forest Reserve Fund in the State Treasury shall be apportioned by the county superintendent of schools to school districts and community college districts of the county lying within or adjacent to the United States forest reserve with approval of the county board of education in a manner which shall be prescribed prior to the 30th day of June of the fiscal year next following the year in which received.

When a portion of the area of a county is subject to the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools of another county or counties and such portion lies in or adjacent to the United States forest reserve, no apportionment of such money shall be made from the county school service fund without the approval of the county boards of education of both or all counties. In the event that both or all county boards of education do not concur in the apportionments of such money from the county school service fund prior to the first day of April of any year the county superintendent of schools of both or all counties shall on that date notify the Superintendent of Public Instruction or board of governors who shall, not later than 60 days following notification, make the apportionments. Apportionments made by the Superintendent of Public Instruction or board of governors are final.

Money apportioned pursuant to this section shall be deposited by the county auditor to the credit of the several funds as directed by the county superintendent of schools with the approval of the county board of education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. County School Supply Revolving Fund [2400. - 2403.]

2400.

The county superintendent of schools, or, when so directed by him or her, the county purchasing agent, shall, whenever a school supply revolving fund is established, purchase school supplies and equipment for the school districts of the county which are required or authorized to purchase supplies or equipment through him or her, and upon requisition therefor by the proper authorities of the district shall deliver or cause the supplies to be delivered to the district together with a memorandum of the amount of the cost of the supplies delivered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.

Upon proper evidence of the receipt by any school district of the school supplies and equipment, and upon approval by the county superintendent of schools for payment of the invoice therefor, he shall draw his requisition upon the county auditor against the proper funds of the district in favor of the school supply revolving fund for the cost of the supplies and equipment plus a charge, not to exceed 10 percent of the cost, to cover expenses of handling and possible losses. He shall thereupon draw his requisition upon the county auditor against the school supply revolving fund in favor of the vendor of the supplies and equipment in the amount of the approved invoice. The requisitions, when allowed and signed by the county auditor, constitute warrants on the county treasurer against the funds of the district and against the school supply revolving fund, respectively.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

2402.

The county superintendent of schools, or, if so directed by him, the county purchasing agent, may employ such help as is necessary to care for the receiving, handling, and forwarding of school supplies and equipment, and the necessary wages and expenses for the help shall be paid from the school supply revolving fund on requisition by the superintendent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

2403.

The superintendent of schools may determine to abolish the school supply revolving fund in his county by serving notice in writing upon the auditor and treasurer of the county. Upon filing the notice discontinuing the fund, the superintendent of schools shall immediately arrange for the sale of supplies in his possession at their market price at the time of the sale plus any handling charges that may be charged against them. The sums secured from the sale shall be deposited by the superintendent of schools in the revolving fund which shall then be returned by the auditor to the respective districts from which it was created. A determination upon the part of the superintendent of schools to dispose of the school supply revolving fund shall not prejudice his right at a future time to recreate the fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. County Tax Rates, County Superintendents [2550.3. - 2573.]



  ARTICLE 3. Computation of Revenue Limits [2550.3. - 2558.]

2550.3.

Each county superintendent of schools, as a condition of apportionment, shall report separately to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, not later than May 1, 1998, and September 1, 1998, respectively, what portions of attendance in the schools and classes maintained by the county superintendent that was reported for each of the 1996–97 and 1997–98 school years pursuant to Section 41601 consisted of absences excused pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 46010 and to Section 46015, as those sections read on July 1, 1996.

Each report shall be prepared in accordance with instructions and on forms prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 846, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2553.

For major capital outlay projects or major repair or replacement projects, which cannot be funded by other revenue sources, county superintendents of schools shall be eligible for such funds in the same manner as specified by law for school districts. Any funds apportioned to the county superintendent pursuant to this section shall be restricted to the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1354, Sec. 2.5.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

2555.

Beginning July 1, 1979, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall apportion an amount to each county superintendent sufficient for payments required pursuant to any school building aid law previously funded by a tax levied pursuant to Section 2503.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

2556.

For the purposes of the allocation of property tax revenues for the 1979–80 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter pursuant to Part 0.5 (commencing with Section 95) of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, property tax revenues received for the 1977–78 fiscal year pursuant to Sections 41203 and 84203 of the Education Code, or for the 1978–79 fiscal year pursuant to Section 2 of Chapter 51, Statutes of 1979, shall be deemed to be property tax revenues received by the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

2558.

Notwithstanding any other law, for the 1979–80 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall apportion state aid to county superintendents of schools pursuant to this section.

(a) The Superintendent shall total the amounts computed for the fiscal year pursuant to Sections 2550, 2551.3, 2554, 2555, and 2557 and Section 2551, as that section read on January 1, 1999. For the 1979–80 fiscal year and for purposes of calculating the 1979–80 fiscal year base amounts in succeeding fiscal years, the amounts in Sections 2550, 2551, 2552, 2554, 2555, and 2557, as they read in the 1979–80 fiscal year, shall be multiplied by a factor of 0.994. For the 1981–82 fiscal year and for purposes of calculating the 1981–82 fiscal year base amounts in succeeding fiscal years, the
 amount in this subdivision shall be multiplied by a factor of 0.97.

(b) For the 1995–96 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the county superintendent of schools shall adjust the total revenue limit computed pursuant to this section by the amount of increased or decreased employer contributions to the Public Employees’ Retirement System resulting from the enactment of Chapter 330 of the Statutes of 1982, adjusted for any changes in those contributions resulting from subsequent changes in employer contribution rates, excluding rate changes due to the direct transfer of the state-mandated portion of the employer contributions to the Public Employees’ Retirement System through the current fiscal year. The adjustment shall be calculated for each county superintendent of schools as follows:

(1) Determine the amount of employer contributions that would have been made in the
 current fiscal year if the applicable Public Employees’ Retirement System employee contribution rate in effect immediately before the enactment of Chapter 330 of the Statutes of 1982 were in effect during the current fiscal year.

(2) Determine the actual amount of employer contributions made to the Public Employees’ Retirement System in the current fiscal year.

(3) If the amount determined in paragraph (1) is greater than the amount determined in paragraph (2), the total revenue limit computed pursuant to this part for that county superintendent of schools shall be decreased by the amount of the difference between those paragraphs; or if the amount determined in paragraph (1) is less than the amount determined in paragraph (2), the total revenue limit for that county superintendent of schools shall be increased by the amount of the difference between those paragraphs.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, employer contributions to the Public Employees’ Retirement System for either of the following positions shall be excluded from the calculation specified above:

(A) Positions or portions of positions supported by federal funds that are subject to supplanting restrictions.

(B) Positions supported, to the extent of employers’ contributions not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) by any single educational agency, from a non-General Fund revenue source determined to be properly excludable from this subdivision by the Superintendent with the approval of the Director of Finance. Commencing in the 2002–03 fiscal year, only positions supported from a non-General Fund revenue source determined to be properly excludable as identified for a particular local educational agency or
 pursuant to a blanket waiver by the Superintendent and the Director of Finance, before the 2002–03 fiscal year, may be excluded pursuant to this paragraph.

(5) For accounting purposes, any reduction to county office of education revenue limits made by this subdivision may be reflected as an expenditure from appropriate sources of revenue as directed by the Superintendent.

(6) The amount of the increase or decrease to the revenue limits of county superintendents of schools made by this subdivision for the 1995–96 to 2001–02 fiscal years, inclusive, may not be adjusted by the deficit factor applied to the revenue limit of each county superintendent of schools pursuant to Section 2558.45.

(7) For the 2003–04 fiscal year and any fiscal year thereafter, the revenue limit reduction specified in Section 2558.46 may not be
 applied to the amount of the increase or decrease to the revenue limits of each county superintendent of schools computed pursuant to paragraph (3).

(c) The Superintendent shall also subtract from the amount determined in subdivision (a) the sum of all of the following:

(1) Local property tax revenues received pursuant to Section 2573 in the then current fiscal year, and tax revenues received pursuant to Section 2556 in the then current fiscal year.

(2) State and federal categorical aid for the fiscal year.

(3) District contributions pursuant to Section 52321 for the fiscal year, and other applicable local contributions and revenues.

(4) Any amounts that the county superintendent of
 schools was required to maintain as restricted and not available for expenditure in the 1978–79 fiscal year as specified in the second paragraph of subdivision (c) of Section 6 of Chapter 292 of the Statutes of 1978, as amended by Chapter 51 of the Statutes of 1979.

(5) The amount received pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 33607.5 of the Health and Safety Code that is considered property taxes pursuant to that section.

(6) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Sections 34177, 34179.5, 34179.6, and 34188 of the Health and Safety Code.

(7) The amount, if any, received pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.
